Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-317
Pickle card unit, defined.

Pickle card unit shall mean a series or complete set of pickle cards, which consists of all winning and losing cards in a particular unit, set, series, deal, or scheme for a lottery by the sale of pickle cards, in the receptacle or box in and with which the unit of pickle cards is sold by a distributor.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 9;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-140.05;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 83.